Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 6 Acquisition of Land

37-6-1.
State properties committee — Composition.

There is hereby created and established a committee to be known as the state properties committee to act in cooperation with the departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, and agencies of the state for the purpose of acquiring, administering, and disposing of interests in land and other real property for the improvement of the administration of the state government, the advancement of commerce, and the protection and improvement of the health, welfare, and safety of the inhabitants of this state. The committee shall be composed of a member appointed by the director of the department of administration to serve as chairperson; the attorney general, serving ex-officio; the general treasurer, serving as a nonvoting ex-officio member; the director of the department of administration, serving ex-officio; and two (2) members representing the public, appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The ex-officio members, including the chairperson, may from time to time designate a subordinate, from within his or her department or division, as a substitute member of the committee, in his or her stead, by filing a written notice thereof, in the office of the secretary of state. Any designation may be revoked at any time by filing a written revocation in the secretary of state’s office. The public member shall be appointed by the governor to serve for a term of three (3) years and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, the appointment to be made for a term commencing March 1, 1961, and each third year thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-1

; P.L. 1961, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 160; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 78; P.L. 2006, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 502, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 350, § 1.

37-6-1.1.
Reporting requirements.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the committee shall approve and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state, of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide an operating statement, summarizing meetings or hearings held, including meeting minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, applications considered and their disposition, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year, including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the counsel; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year, and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the websites of the general assembly and the secretary of state pursuant to the provisions of §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 408, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 502, § 2.

37-6-1.2.
Training requirements.

The committee shall conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the committee, be approved by the committee, and be conducted by the chair of the committee. The committee may approve the use of any committee and/or staff member and/or individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2; and the committee’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act [July 7, 2006], prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14, and 38-2.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 408, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 502, § 2.

37-6-1.3.
Public disclosure of the management and disposal of property.

The state properties committee shall prepare and submit to the secretary of state quarterly a list containing:

Any and all action(s) taken or approval(s) given pursuant to Rhode Island general laws §§

37-7-1

,

37-7-2

,

37-7-3

,

37-7-5

,

37-7-5

.1,

37-7-8

, and

37-7-9

;

The name(s), including corporate and fictitious name(s), of all parties to any action taken or approval given;

The location, by number, street, and city/town, along with tax assessor’s plat and lot, of any property effected by any action taken or approval given;

The amount of payment or reimbursement paid or to be paid in each instance; and

Location of each document, deed, and/or other instrument of conveyance and demise of land or other real property sold or leased.

The secretary of state shall compile, publish, and make available for public inspection all lists prepared in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 393, § 1.

37-6-2.
Rules, regulations, and procedures of committee.

The state properties committee is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and prescribe rules of procedure and regulations, and from time to time amend, change, and eliminate rules and regulations, and make such orders and perform such actions as it may deem necessary to the proper administration of this chapter and §§

37-7-1

—

37-7-9

. In the performance of the commission’s duties hereunder, the commission may in any particular case prescribe a variation in procedure or regulation when it shall deem it necessary in view of the exigencies of the case and the importance of speedy action in order to carry out the intent and purpose of this chapter and §§

37-7-1

—

37-7-9

. The commission shall file written notice thereof in the office of the secretary of state. All filings shall be available for public inspection.

The following siting criteria shall be utilized whenever current existing leases expire or additional office space is needed:

A preference shall be given to sites designated as enterprise zone census tracts pursuant to chapter 64.3 of title 42, or in blighted and/or substandard areas pursuant to §

45-31-8

, or in downtown commercial areas where it can be shown the facilities would make a significant impact on the economic vitality of the community’s central business district;

Consideration should be given to adequate access via public transportation for both employees as well as the public being served, and, where appropriate, adequate parking; and

A site must be consistent with the respective community’s local comprehensive plan.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 191, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 244, § 1].

The state properties committee shall explain, in writing, how each site selected by the committee for a state facility meets the criteria described in subsection (b) of this section.

For any lease, rental agreement, or extension of an existing rental agreement for leased office and operating space that carries a term of five (5) years or longer, including any options or extensions that bring the total term to five (5) years or longer, where the state is the tenant and the aggregate rent of the terms exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), the state properties committee shall request approval of the general assembly prior to entering into any new agreements or signing any extensions with existing landlords. The state properties committee, in the form of a resolution, shall provide information relating to the purpose of the lease or rental agreement, the agency’s current lease or rental costs, the expiration date of any present lease or rental agreement, the range of costs of a new lease or rental agreement, the proposed term of a new agreement, and the location and owner of the desired property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-2

; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 113, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 160; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 38, § 23; P.L. 2019, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 244, § 1.

37-6-3.
Detail of state employees to duty with committee.

Upon request of the state properties committee, the head of any department, board, bureau, or commission of the state government shall detail to the committee any state employee under his or her supervision whose assistance as professional personnel, technician, or expert, or whose services as stenographer or clerical worker shall be deemed necessary or desirable to the work of the committee, for temporary duty with the committee for periods not exceeding two (2) weeks in any one case.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-3

.

37-6-4.
Powers and duties supplemental.

The powers and duties vested in the state purchasing agent, the director of administration, and the attorney general by the provisions of this chapter and §§

37-7-1

—

37-7-9

shall be construed to be in addition to any and all other powers and duties vested in them by any other general or public law, and not in substitution thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-4

.

37-6-5.
Power of department and agency heads to acquire property for public use.

Whenever in the opinion of the head of any department, board, bureau, commission, or agency of the state government, hereinafter referred to as the acquiring authority, the acquisition of land or other real property or any interest, estate, or right therein is necessary or advantageous to the establishment, acquisition, construction, development, betterment, or maintenance of any governmental facility, public work, or public improvement, the acquiring authority shall be and hereby is authorized and empowered, within the limits of the appropriations that are available or that shall be made available, with the approval of the state properties committee, and in the case of purchases by or gifts or devises to the state, subject to the approval of the governor, to take in fee simple or otherwise in the name and for the benefit of the state of Rhode Island, by purchase, lease, gift, or devise lands and other real property and rights, interests, estates, easements, and privileges therein, and foreshore, riparian, and littoral rights thereto for the public use within the state of Rhode Island.

No acquiring authority shall relinquish riparian rights of Colt State Park or Poppasquash Road, Bristol to any entity for private use.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-5

; P.L. 2005, ch. 432, § 1.

37-6-6.
Notice to Rhode Island economic development corporation of proposed acquisition or disposal.

Before acquiring and before disposing of any land or other real property or any interest, estate, or right therein, by conveyance, grant, lease, or license, except by license terminable by will, the acquiring authority shall give written notice of its contemplated or proposed action to the Rhode Island economic development corporation and afford the corporation a reasonable opportunity to study and make its recommendations thereon.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-6

.

37-6-7.
Consideration of public interest — Certificate that state employee is not interested in site selected.

In the selection of a site for acquisition for any public use, reference shall be had to the interest and convenience of the public, as well as to the best interests of the state government. The state properties committee shall have the power, and it shall be its duty, to set aside any selection which in its opinion has not been made solely with reference thereto. Before any site shall be finally adopted, each and every state employee acting in the selection of the site shall make and file with the committee a certificate under penalty of perjury that he or she is not, at the time of making the certificate, and was not at the date of making the selection of the site, directly or indirectly, interested in the property selected for the same, and that he or she has not received and will not receive, either directly or indirectly, any inducement, commission, brokerage, fee, consideration, gift, or reward for or as a result of the selection or acquisition of the site.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-7

.

37-6-8.
Approval and filing of conveyances to state.

Every instrument conveying an interest in land or other real property to the state shall, prior to acceptance, be approved by the acquiring authority, and as to substance, by the director of administration, and as to form, by the attorney general, and a copy of each instrument of conveyance shall be filed with the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-8

.

37-6-9.
Acceptance of conveyances by treasurer.

The general treasurer is hereby directed, authorized, and empowered, with the approval of the acquiring authority, and subject to the approval of the state properties committee and of the governor, to receive, take title to, and hold in trust for the state, exempt from taxation, any gift, grant, or devise of lands or interests, estates, or rights, therein made for the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-9

.

37-6-10.
Acquisition of limited or encumbered title.

Whenever in the opinion of the acquiring authority the purposes for which control over any land or other real property is needed are not essentially impaired by the acquisition of an interest in the land, or other real property less than a fee simple, or less than perpetual in duration, or subject to any easements or rights of way, or subject to reserved or outstanding interests or rights, and there is a substantial saving in cost by acquiring limited title or title subject to the encumbrances, reserved or outstanding interests or rights in the land or other real property, as compared with the cost of acquiring fee simple unencumbered title thereto, the acquiring authority shall be and hereby is authorized and empowered, with the approval of the state properties committee, to take and accept an interest less than a fee simple in the land or real property, or for a limited period of time, or subject to easements, rights of way, reserved or outstanding interests or rights, and the attorney general in that case may approve the limited title or title subject to easements, rights of way, reservations, or outstanding interests or rights.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-10

.

37-6-11.
Acquisition of outstanding interests limiting or encumbering title.

Whenever estates, rights, interests, easements, and privileges in lands or other real property can be acquired at prices reasonable in the judgment of the state properties committee, the acquiring authority is authorized and empowered to acquire the estates, rights, interests, easements, and privileges by purchase. The state controller, upon the passage of title to the state, is authorized and directed, upon receipt by him or her of proper and duly authenticated vouchers, to draw his or her order upon the general treasurer for the payment of the purchase price therefor out of the amount appropriated to the acquiring authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-11

.

37-6-12.
Examination of title by attorney general — Acquisition of title insurance.

The attorney general shall require the state purchasing agent to engage a title insurance company doing business within this state to furnish a certificate of title or to issue to the state a policy of title insurance covering the real estate, and the expense of procuring the certificate or title insurance policy shall be paid out of the appropriation made to the acquiring authority for the acquisition. No public money shall be expended upon any site or land purchased by, devised to, or conveyed as a gift to the state until the acquisition of such certificate of title or policy of title insurance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-12

; P.L. 2002, ch. 401, § 2.

37-6-13.
Authorization of condemnation for road purposes.

Whenever in the opinion of the director of transportation the acquisition of land or other real property or any interest, estate, or right therein is necessary or advantageous for the establishing, laying out, widening, extending, relocating, regrading, straightening, or improving of any public highway, street, or parkway, or to secure more suitable lines, grades, or safety, the state properties committee may authorize the acquisition thereof by condemnation proceedings; provided, however, the state properties committee shall not authorize any land or estate owned and used by any railroad company to be taken by condemnation until after hearing before the division of public utilities and carriers and until the consent of the division of public utilities and carriers to the taking shall be given.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-13

.

37-6-13.1.
Authorization of condemnation for state office buildings.

Whenever in the opinion of the director of administration the acquisition of land or other real property or any interest, estate, or right therein is necessary or advantageous for the construction of state office buildings, including parking areas required therefor, and other related facilities within that parcel of real estate bounded on the north by Orms Street, on the west by Freeway Service Drive, on the south by Smith Street and on the east by the railroad tracks of the New York, New Haven, and Hartford Railroad Company, except that portion of the parcel owned by St. Patrick’s Church, Providence, Rhode Island, the state properties committee may authorize the acquisition thereof by condemnation proceedings; provided, however, the state properties committee shall not authorize any land or estate owned and used by any railroad company to be taken by condemnation until after a hearing before the division of public utilities and carriers and until the consent of the division of public utilities and carriers to the taking shall be given.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 91, § 1.

37-6-14.
Filing of condemnation papers — Vesting of title — Availability of state treasury funds.

Within six (6) months after the state properties committee has authorized condemnation proceedings, the acquiring authority shall file in the office of the recorder of deeds or town clerk in the city or town where the land or other real property to be acquired is situated, a description of the land or other real property, a plat thereof, a statement that the land or other real property is taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and the nature of the title to be acquired, whether the title be a fee simple or less than perpetual in duration, or subject to any easements or rights of way, or subject to any reserved or outstanding interests or rights, or subject to any encumbrances. The description, plat, and statement shall be signed by the head of the acquiring authority and upon the filing of the description, plat, and statement the title of such land or other real property as set forth in the statement shall vest in the state of Rhode Island. All funds at any time in the state treasury not otherwise appropriated shall thereupon be available for the payment of the value of the land or other real property so taken and of appurtenant damage to any remainder with lawful interest thereon.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 11; P.L. 1955, ch. 3515, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-14

.

37-6-15.
Service of notice of condemnation.

After the filing of the description, plat, and statement, a notice of the taking of the land or other real property shall be served upon the owner and persons having an estate or right in or who are interested in the land or other real property by any deputy sheriff, or constable for the county in which the land or other real property is situated. The officer who shall leave a true and attested copy of the description and statement with each of the persons personally or at their last and usual place of abode in this state with some person living there, and in case any of the persons are absent from this state and have no last and usual place of abode therein occupied by any person, the copy shall be left with the person or persons, if any, in charge of, or having possession of, the land or other real property taken of the absent persons, and another copy thereof shall be mailed to the address of the absent persons, if the same is known to the officer serving the notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 11; P.L. 1955, ch. 3515, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-15

; P.L. 1993, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 72.

37-6-16.
Publication of notice of condemnation.

After the filing of the description and statement, the acquiring authority shall cause a notice of condemnation to be published in the newspaper of greatest circulation in the city or town where the land or other real property is located at least once a week for three (3) successive weeks. The notice shall contain the name of the acquiring authority, the plat number of the taking, the date the condemnation was authorized by the state properties committee, the date of the taking, the property interest or interests acquired, the purpose of the taking, and the location of the area of the condemnation together with a statement that the complete description may be obtained from the office of the director of the condemning authority.

For the purposes of this statute, a notice in substantially the following form will suffice: NOTICE OF CONDEMNATION — [Plat Number]. Location: [City or Town] — [Street, streets or area or location of taking]. The [condemning authority] pursuant to authorization received from the state properties committee on [date] did on [date] take [fee, simple title, permanent easements, temporary easements, or other interest in property] in the location referred to above for [purpose of taking]. A complete description of the taking may be obtained from [the office of the director of the condemning authority, address].

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 11; P.L. 1955, ch. 3515, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-16

; P.L. 1982, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 85, § 1.

37-6-17.
Payment of agreed price for condemned land.

If any party shall agree with the acquiring authority upon the sum to be paid for the value of the land or other real property so taken and of appurtenant damage to any remainder or for the value of his or her estate, right, or interest therein, and the price shall be approved by the state properties committee, the price shall be paid to him or her forthwith. The state controller is authorized and directed, upon receipt by him or her of proper and duly authenticated vouchers, to draw his or her order upon the general treasurer for the payment of the agreed price out of any funds appropriated and available therefor; provided, however, that if any party shall fail to agree with the acquiring authority upon the sum to be paid for the value of the land or other real property so taken and of appurtenant damage to any remainder or for the value of his or her estate, right, or interest therein, then, the state properties committee, upon the application of the party in interest and of the joinder of all other parties in interest shall order paid forthwith, to the party or parties so applying for or on account of the just compensation to be awarded under a petition filed or to be filed in the superior court for the assessment of damages, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, not less than one hundred percent (100%) of the acquiring authority’s offer pending final disposition of the court proceeding. The verdict and the judgment thereafter entered in the court proceeding shall not include any item for interest upon such amount as shall be or could have been ordered paid by the state properties committee on account of the just compensation for any period of time from and after thirty (30) days following the making in writing of the acquiring authority’s offer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 11; P.L. 1955, ch. 3515, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-17

; P.L. 1961, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 225.

37-6-18.
Petition for assessment of damages by jury.

Any owner of, or any person entitled to any estate or right in, or interested in any part of the land or other real property so taken, who cannot agree with the acquiring authority upon the price to be paid for his or her estate, right, or interest in land or other real property so taken and the appurtenant damage to the remainder, may within one year from the filing of the description and statement aforesaid, apply by petition to the superior court in the county of Providence or to the superior court for one of the counties in which the land or other real property may be situated, setting forth the taking of his or her land or his or her estate or interest therein and praying for an assessment of damages by a jury. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall cause twenty (20) days notice of the pendency thereof to be given to the acquiring authority by serving the head thereof with a certified copy thereof and by leaving certified copies thereof at the office of the attorney general and at the office of the state properties committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 11; P.L. 1955, ch. 3515, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-18

.

37-6-19.
Late filing of petition for assessment of damages.

In case any owner of or any person having an estate or interest in land or other real property shall fail to file his or her petition as provided in §

37-6-18

, the superior court in the county of Providence or the superior court for one of the counties in which the land or other real property may be situated, in its discretion, may permit the filing of the petition subsequent to the one year period from the filing of the description and statement; provided, the person shall have had no actual knowledge of the taking of the land in time to file the petition; and provided, that the state shall not have paid any other person or persons claiming to own the land the value thereof or be liable to pay for the land under any judgment rendered under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 12; P.L. 1955, ch. 3515, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-19

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 160.

37-6-20.
Pretrial conference with state properties committee — Proceeding to trial.

In the event that the government of the United States of America does not participate with the state of Rhode Island in the payment of any funds to the claimant or claimants of an estate, then within sixty (60) days after the service of a certified copy upon the head of the acquiring authority, the owner of and any person entitled to any estate in or interested in any part of the land or other real property so taken shall confer with the state properties committee and, if at the expiration of ninety (90) days after the service of the certified copy upon the head of the acquiring authority, the owner of and person entitled to any estate in or interested in any part of the land or other real property so taken has not agreed with the state properties committee upon the price to be paid for his or her estate, right, or interest in the land or other real property so taken and the appurtenant damage to the remainder, he or she may proceed to the trial thereof in the superior court. In the event that the government of the United States of America does participate with the state of Rhode Island in the payment of any funds, in any proportion, to the claimant or claimants of the estate, then the owner of and any person entitled to any estate in or interested in any part of the land or other real property so taken shall not confer with the state properties committee, but the cause may then proceed to trial in the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 12; P.L. 1955, ch. 3515, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-20

; P.L. 1962, ch. 9, § 1.

37-6-21.
Conduct of trial on damages.

A trial shall be conducted as other civil actions at law are tried. The trial shall determine all questions of fact relating to the value of the estate or interest in the land or other real property taken and the appurtenant damage to any remainder and the amount thereof. The trial and verdict of the jury shall be subject to all rights to move for new trial and to appeal as are provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 12; P.L. 1955, ch. 3515, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-21

.

37-6-21.1.
Expediting proceedings.

In any proceedings for the assessment of damages for real property so taken by the state under the provisions of this chapter, at any time during the pendency of the action or proceeding, the state or owner may apply to the court for an order directing the owner or state, as the case may be, to show cause why the further proceeding should not be expedited. The court may upon application make an order requiring that the hearings proceed and that any other steps be taken with all possible expedition, and all the court actions shall have precedence on the calendar and shall continue to have precedence on the calendar on a day-to-day basis until the matter is heard.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 240, § 1.

37-6-22.
Consolidation of petitions as to same land.

In case two (2) or more petitioners make claim to the same land, or other real property, or to any estate or interest therein, or to different estates or interests in the same parcel of land or other real property, the court shall, upon motion, consolidate their several petitions for trial and shall frame all necessary issues therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 12; P.L. 1955, ch. 3515, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-22

.

37-6-23.
Calculation of interest and payment of judgment.

If a petition for assessment of damages is filed, then the property owner shall be entitled to interest on the fair market value of the property taken by the acquiring authority from the date it is condemned to the day that judgment enters. Interest thereon shall be calculated on the fair market value of the property which exceeds the amount offered by the acquiring authority pending final disposition of the court proceedings. Upon a recovery of final judgment, an execution shall be issued therefor and shall be forthwith paid by the general treasurer out of any funds appropriated and available therefor. Interest on any judgment shall be computed daily to the date of payment and shall be compounded annually. Interest shall be calculated as follows:

Where the period for which interest is owed does not exceed one year, interest shall be calculated for such period form the date of taking at an annual rate equal to the weekly average one year constant maturity Treasury yield, as published by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, for the calendar week preceding the date of the taking.

Where the period for which interest is owed is more than one year, interest for the first year shall be calculated in accordance with subdivision (1) of this section and interest for each additional year shall be calculated on the combined amount of the principal and accrued interest at an annual rate equal to the weekly average one year constant maturity Treasury yield, as published by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, for the calendar week preceding the beginning of each additional year.

In the event the one year constant maturity Treasury yield is converted to a different standard reference base or otherwise revised, the determination of interest shall be made with the use of such converted or revised standard reference base. In the event the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System ceases to publish a converted or revised rate, interest shall be calculated at a rate published by the United States Treasury Department, or other comparable entity, that establishes a rate reflecting or best approximating the market conditions for one year investments at the time of the taking and each additional year that interest is owed pursuant to subdivision (2) above.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 12; P.L. 1955, ch. 3515, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

37-6-23

; P.L. 1962, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 555, § 4; P.L. 1994, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 36.

Applicability.

P.L. 2003, ch. 260, § 3 provides that the amendment to this section by that act takes effect upon passage [July 17, 2003] and shall apply retroactively to the calculation of interest on condemnation awards and shall be used for calculating interest on condemnation awards for any period from and after February 28, 2001, and the rate of interest for periods prior to February 28, 2001, shall continue to be calculated in the same manner as before this amendment.

P.L. 2003, ch. 275, § 3 provides that the amendment to this section by that act takes effect upon passage [July 17, 2003] and shall apply retroactively to the calculation of interest on condemnation awards and shall be used for calculating interest on condemnation award for any period from and after February 28, 2001, and the rate of interest for periods prior to February 28, 2001, shall continue to be calculated in the same manner as before this amendment.

37-6-23.1.
Procedure where no claim filed or owner unknown or under disability.

If, after the expiration of one year following the filing of the description, plat, and statement as provided in §

37-6-14

, and after notice by publication as prescribed by §

37-6-16

, no petition for an assessment of damages has been filed in the superior court pursuant to §

37-6-18

or otherwise, the acquiring authority may petition the superior court for one of the counties in which the land or other real property is situated for a determination of the fair value of the land or other real property so taken and of appurtenant damages to any remainder, or for the value of any estate, right, or interest therein. After such notice as the court shall order, the court shall proceed to hear the matter and shall enter a decision for the amount or amounts to be awarded and costs. Upon entry of judgment, the acquiring authority shall forthwith deposit the sum so awarded in the registry of the court in a special account to accumulate for the benefit of the person entitled thereto. The acquiring authority making the deposit shall take the receipt of the clerk of the superior court therefor which shall operate as a release and discharge to the acquiring authority for all claims for damages resulting from the taking. When any person entitled to money so deposited shall satisfy the superior court of his or her right to receive the money, the court shall cause the money to be paid over to him or her with all accumulations thereon.

If the owner of or person entitled to any estate, right, or interest in any part of the land so taken shall be found to be a person unascertained, or not in being, or a person whose whereabouts are unknown, or a minor or other person not capable in law to act in his or her own behalf, or a person in military service, or if the owner or person shall default in answering the petition, the superior court before which the proceeding is pending shall appoint an attorney at law duly admitted to practice in this state as a guardian ad litem or other representative for the person, and the guardian or representative shall appear, represent, and be heard in behalf of the person. Before entering judgment, the court shall fix the fee to be paid to each guardian or representative so appointed and the fees for any appraisers engaged by him or her. These amount of expenses to be allowed him or her, which fees and expenses shall be considered charges against and shall be deducted from the sum deposited in the registry for the benefit of the person, and the receipt therefor of the guardian or representative so appointed shall be a sufficient discharge to the clerk of court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 76, § 1.

37-6-23.2.
Deposit of fair market value as determined by state’s reviewing appraiser.

If, after the expiration of one year following the filing of the description, plat, and statement as provided in §

37-6-14

, and after notice by publication as prescribed by §

37-6-16

, no petition for an assessment of damages has been filed in the superior court pursuant to §

37-6-18

or otherwise, the acquiring authority may petition the superior court for one of the counties in which the land or other real property is situated or for Providence county for permission to deposit in the registry of the court a sum of money equal to the amount of appraisal of the parcel of land taken which was approved by the state’s reviewing appraiser as the fair market value of the parcel or parcels of land taken and of appurtenant damages to any remainder. The sum shall be deposited in the registry of the court in a special account to accumulate for the benefit of the person or persons entitled thereto. The acquiring authority making the deposit shall take the receipt of the clerk of the superior court as evidence of his or her compliance with the order of the court. After such notice as the court shall order, the court after hearing evidence as to the approved figure of the state’s reviewing appraiser, as aforesaid, shall direct the amount to be so deposited and invested. The acquiring authority shall have the right to join several parcels of land in a single petition, despite the fact that the parcels are owned by different persons, but, wherever possible, the sum deposited for each parcel owned separately or owned in common by more than one person shall be designated and recorded with the clerk of court at the time of the deposit. When any person entitled to money so deposited shall satisfy the superior court of his or her right to receive the money, the court shall cause the money to be paid over to him or her with all accumulations thereon.

If a petition is filed under the provisions of §

37-6-23.1

after the deposit of a sum of money in the registry of the court has been made for the land or real property so taken in accordance with the provisions of this section, upon entry of judgment thereon, the court shall order the sum of money theretofore deposited in the registry of the court transferred to the special account provided for in §

37-6-23.1

, and the acquiring authority shall thereupon deposit in the special account a sum of money equal to the difference between the sum transferred and the sum awarded by the court in its decision made under the provisions of § 37-6-23.1.

Nothing in this section shall prevent or interfere with the operation of any other section of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 160.